Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.95.120

Tuition units exempt from bankruptcy and enforcement of judgments.

In regard to bankruptcy filings and enforcement of judgments under Title 6 RCW, tuition units purchased more than two years prior to the date of filing or judgment will be considered excluded personal assets.

[ 2005 c 272 s 5.]